California statutes. Public Utilities Code
The VTA may exercise any and all powers granted by any other law that, by its terms, is applicable to transit districts generally, to public agencies generally, or to any classification of districts or public agencies that includes an entity of the type provided for in this part, but the VTA shall not exercise any power contrary to an express provision of this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 381, Sec. 38.   (AB 2196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

100115.5.

(a) The VTA may administer and implement any adopted countywide transportation expenditure plan funded in an amount greater than 50 percent from revenues derived from a retail transaction and use tax, if so designated in the plan or if the VTA and the entity that imposes the tax have entered into an agreement that so provides. The VTA may exercise those powers necessary to carry out this purpose.

(b) The VTA may do any and all things necessary to ensure the completion of any projects established in a plan as set forth in subdivision (a). These projects may include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(1) The construction and improvement of state highways.

(2) The construction, maintenance, and improvement of local roads, streets, and county highways.

(3) The construction, improvement, and operation of public transit systems, including paratransit services.

(4) The construction and improvement of bicycle and other transportation facilities.

(c) The VTA shall consult with and coordinate any actions for administering and implementing a plan as set forth in subdivision (a) with the cities in the county, the board of supervisors, and the Department of Transportation.

(d) Nothing in this section shall vary the terms of the cooperative agreement dated July 1, 1999, between the
 VTA and the County of Santa Clara for the construction of transportation projects utilizing local transaction and use tax revenues derived from Santa Clara County general tax Measure B approved by the voters in November 1996. If any of the provisions of this section conflict with the provisions of that cooperative agreement, the provisions of the cooperative agreement shall take precedence.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 381, Sec. 39.   (AB 2196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Contracts [100120. - 100126.]

100120.

The VTA may make contracts and enter into stipulations of any nature whatsoever, either in connection with eminent domain proceedings or otherwise, including, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, contracts and stipulations to indemnify and save harmless, to employ labor, and to do all acts necessary and convenient for the full exercise of the powers granted in this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 381, Sec. 40.   (AB 2196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

100121.

The VTA may contract with any department or agency of the United States of America, with any public agency or with any person upon terms and conditions as the board finds is for the best interest of the VTA.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 381, Sec. 41.   (AB 2196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

100124.

The VTA may insure against any accident or destruction of the system or any part thereof. The VTA may insure against loss of revenues from any cause whatsoever. It may provide, in the proceedings authorizing the issuance of any bonds, for the carrying of insurance in an amount and of a character as may be specified and for the payment of premiums thereon. The VTA may also provide insurance as provided in Part 6 (commencing with Section 989) of Division 3.6 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 381, Sec. 42.   (AB 2196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

100125.

The VTA may contract for the services of independent contractors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 381, Sec. 43.   (AB 2196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

100126.

The Santa Clara County Transit District, which was established with the approval of the voters in 1972, shall continue as an entity under the control of its governing board as reorganized pursuant to the amendments to this part by statutes that were enacted in 1994. Nothing in the act that added this section during the second year of the 1993–94 Regular Session shall be construed to alter, impair, or terminate existing contracts between the district and other parties, including, but not limited to, funding agreements, grants, labor agreements, agreements entered into pursuant to Section 13(c) of the Federal Transit Act and its antecedents, bonds, notes, equipment trust certificates, or other obligations of the district. All rights and powers of the district shall
 continue in full force and effect and no affirmation, adoption, or assumption by the board of directors is required for that continuation. The VTA shall become the successor to certain county contracts as provided by agreement between the county and the VTA.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 381, Sec. 44.   (AB 2196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Property [100130. - 100133.]

100130.

The VTA may take by grant, purchase, devise, or lease, or condemn in proceedings under eminent domain, or otherwise acquire, and hold and enjoy, real and personal property of every kind within or without the boundaries of the VTA necessary to the full or convenient exercise of its powers. The board may lease, mortgage, sell, or otherwise dispose of any real or personal property within or without the boundaries of the VTA necessary to the full or convenient exercise of its powers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 381, Sec. 45.   (AB 2196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

100130.5.

(a) The VTA may take by gift, or take or convey by grant, purchase, devise, or lease, and hold and enjoy, real and personal property of every kind within or without the boundaries of the VTA necessary for, incidental to, or convenient for, transit-oriented joint development projects that meet the definition and requirement set forth in subdivision (b).

(b) (1) For purposes of this section, a transit-oriented joint development project is a commercial, residential, or mixed-use development that is undertaken in connection with existing, planned, or proposed transit facilities and is located
 14 mile or less from the external boundaries of that facility.

(2) Any transit-oriented joint development project created under this section shall comply with the land use and zoning regulations of the city, county, or city and county in which the project is located.

(c) Notwithstanding Sections 53090 and 53091 of the Government Code or any other provision of law, the authority granted under this section is subject to the land use and zoning regulations of the city, county, or city and county jurisdiction in which the transit-oriented joint development is located, in accordance with the Planning and Zoning Law (Title 7 (commencing with Section 65000) of the Government Code), relating to zoning.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 381, Sec. 46.   (AB 2196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

100131.

(a) The VTA may exercise the right of eminent domain to take any property necessary or convenient to the exercise of the powers granted in this part. The VTA, in exercising this power, shall in addition to the damages for the taking, injury, or destruction of property, also pay the cost, exclusive of betterment and with credit for salvage value, of removal, reconstruction, or relocation of any structure, railways, mains, pipes, conduits, wires, cables, or poles of any public utility that are required to be moved to a new location.

(b) No taking or acquisition by the VTA that would involve the abandonment, removal, relocation, or use of the property of a railroad corporation, as
 defined in Section 230, shall be permitted, unless the Public Utilities Commission, after a hearing, shall find and determine that the public interest and necessity require the abandonment, removal, relocation, or use of that property and that the taking or acquisition will not unreasonably impair the ability of the railroad corporation involved to provide safe, adequate, economical, and efficient service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 381, Sec. 47.   (AB 2196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

100132.

The Public Utilities Commission of the state shall have and exercise power and jurisdiction to fix just compensation to be paid for the taking of any property of a public utility in eminent domain proceedings brought by the VTA. The VTA may commence and maintain the eminent domain proceedings in the Public Utilities Commission or the superior court at its option.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 381, Sec. 48.   (AB 2196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

100133.

The VTA is entitled to the benefit of any reservation or grant, in all cases, where any right has been reserved or granted to any public agency to construct or maintain roads, highways, or other crossings over any public or private lands.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 381, Sec. 49.   (AB 2196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Construction Manager/General Contractor Project Delivery Contracts [100150. - 100156.]

100150.

For purposes of this article, the following terms shall have the following meanings:

(a) “Construction Manager/General Contractor method” or “CMGC” means the Construction Manager/General Contractor method as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 6951 of the Public Contract Code.

(b) “Construction manager” means a construction manager as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 6951 of the Public Contract Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 320, Sec. 1.   (AB 797)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

100151.

(a) Subject to the limitations of this article, the authority may utilize the CMGC project delivery method for public transit projects within its jurisdiction.

(b) The authority may enter into a CMGC project delivery method contract pursuant to this article if, after evaluation of the traditional design-bid-build process of construction and of the CMGC project delivery method in a public meeting, the authority makes a written finding that use of the CMGC project delivery method on the specific project under consideration will accomplish one or more of the following objectives: reduce project costs, expedite the project’s completion, or provide features not achievable
 through the design-bid-build method. This finding shall be made prior to the authority entering into a CMGC project delivery method contract. In the CMGC project delivery method proposal, the written findings shall be included as part of an application for state funds for a transit project.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 320, Sec. 1.   (AB 797)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

100152.

Any public works project that is contracted for pursuant to this article shall be subject to the requirements of Section 1771.4 of the Labor Code.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 28, Sec. 85.   (SB 854)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

100153.

(a) If a contract for CMGC services is entered into pursuant to this article and includes preconstruction services by the construction manager, the VTA shall enter into a written contract with the construction manager for preconstruction services, under which the VTA shall pay the construction manager a fee for preconstruction services in an amount agreed upon by the VTA and the construction manager. The preconstruction services contract may include fees for services to be performed during the contract period. The VTA shall not request or obtain a fixed price or a guaranteed maximum price for the construction contract from the construction manager or enter into a construction contract with the construction manager until after the VTA has entered into a services contract. A
 preconstruction services contract shall provide for the subsequent negotiation for construction of all or any discrete phase or phases of the project and shall provide for the VTA to own the design plans and other preconstruction services work product.

(b) A contract for construction services shall be awarded after the plans have been sufficiently developed and either a fixed price or a guaranteed maximum price has been successfully negotiated. In the event that a fixed price or a guaranteed maximum price is not negotiated, the VTA may award the contract for construction services utilizing any other procurement method authorized by law.

(c) The construction manager shall perform not less than 30 percent of the work covered by the fixed price or guaranteed maximum price agreement reached. Work that is not performed directly by the construction manager shall be bid to subcontractors
 pursuant to Section 6955 of the Public Contract Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 381, Sec. 50.   (AB 2196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

100154.

Nothing in this article affects, expands, alters, or limits any rights or remedies otherwise available at law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 320, Sec. 1.   (AB 797)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

100155.

(a) Upon completion of a project using the CMGC project delivery method, the VTA shall prepare a progress report to the board of directors. The progress report shall include, but shall not be limited to, all of the following information:

(1) A description of the project.

(2) The entity that was awarded the project.

(3) The estimated and actual costs of the project.

(4) The estimated and actual schedule for project completion.

(5) A description of any written protests
 concerning any aspect of the solicitation, bid, proposal, or award of the project, including, but not limited to, the resolution of the protests.

(6) An assessment of the prequalification process and criteria utilized under this article.

(7) A description of the method used to evaluate the bid or proposal, including the weighting of each factor and an assessment of the impact of this requirement on a project.

(8) A description of any challenges or unexpected problems that arose during the construction of the project and a description of the solutions that were considered and ultimately implemented to address those challenges and problems.

(9) Recommendations to improve the CMCG project delivery method authorized under this article.

(b) The progress report shall be made available on the VTA’s Internet Web site.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 381, Sec. 51.   (AB 2196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

100156.

(a) The provisions of this article are severable. If any provision of this article or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(b) Contracts awarded pursuant to this article shall be valid until the project is completed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 320, Sec. 1.   (AB 797)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4.5. Job Order Contracting [100157. - 100157.9.]

100157.

For purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Job order contract” means an indefinite-quantity contract for repair, remodeling, or other repetitive work to be done according to unit prices.

(b) “Typical work” means a work description applicable universally or applicable to a large number of individual projects, as distinguished from work specifically described with respect to an individual project.

(c) “Unit price” means the amount paid for a single unit of an item of work.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 803, Sec. 2.   (AB 2763)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, pursuant to Sec.100157.9.)
-------------------------------------------

100157.5.

(a) The VTA may enter into a job order contract.

(b) The VTA shall not enter into a job order contract for work that is protected by collective bargaining agreements.

(c) The VTA shall not enter into a job order contract for new construction.

(d) The VTA may enter into a job order contract only if the job order
 contract, and the task orders within the contract, is subject to the project labor agreement between the VTA and the Santa Clara and San Benito Counties Building and Construction Trades Council, unless otherwise exempted by that project labor agreement.

(e) The VTA shall only enter into a job order contract with the lowest responsible and responsive bidder, based on the bidder’s plans and specifications for typical work.

(f) A single job order contract shall not exceed five million dollars ($5,000,000) in the first term of the job order contract and, if
 extended or renewed, ten million dollars ($10,000,000) over the maximum of two extended terms of the job order contract.

(g) (1) The VTA may execute a job order contract for an initial contract term of no more than 12 months, with the option of extending or renewing the job order contract for two additional 12-month periods. An extension or renewal shall be priced as provided in the invitation for bids. An extension or renewal shall be mutually agreed to by the VTA and the contractor pursuant to the job order contract.

(2) The job order contract shall specify that its term will not exceed the contract term or the date that the maximum value of the contract is achieved, whichever is earlier.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 803, Sec. 2.   (AB 2763)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, pursuant to Sec.100157.9.)
-------------------------------------------

100157.7.

(a) (1) If the VTA acts pursuant to the authorization in subdivision (a) of Section 100157.5, then the VTA, on or before January 1, 2027, shall submit to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature a report on the use of job order contracting under this article.

 (2) The report shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following information:

(A) A description of the VTA’s system for evaluating job order contract bids for award of job order contracts, including, but not limited to, the criteria used by the VTA to determine a qualified and responsive job
 order contractor.

(B) A description of each job order contract awarded and the contractor awarded the contract.

(C) An assessment of the use of job order contracting under this article.

(b) A report to be submitted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 803, Sec. 2.   (AB 2763)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, pursuant to Sec.100157.9.)
-------------------------------------------

100157.9.

This article shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2028, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 803, Sec. 2.   (AB 2763)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Article 4.5 commencing with Sec. 100157.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Transit Facilities and Service [100160. - 100169.]

100160.

The VTA may provide transit service for the transportation of passengers and their incidental baggage by any means.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 381, Sec. 52.   (AB 2196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

100160.1.

The VTA may provide facilities, including streets and highways, for the movement of vehicles, bicycles, and pedestrians. All installations in state highways shall be developed and implemented with the concurrence and under the oversight of the Department of Transportation. The installation shall conform to requirements and regulations established by the Department of Transportation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 381, Sec. 53.   (AB 2196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

100160.2.

The VTA may enter into agreements with any city within the boundaries of the VTA or with the County of Santa Clara to improve a street, road, highway, or expressway under the jurisdiction of the city or county. This section does not apply to highways under the jurisdiction of the state, unless specifically permitted elsewhere in statute.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 381, Sec. 54.   (AB 2196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

100160.5.

The VTA may operate charter bus service subject to the following limitations:

(a) No bus equipment that is designed solely for charter service shall be purchased. A bus equipped with a toilet or underfloor baggage compartment shall be deemed charter equipment.

(b) The board shall hold a public hearing prior to adopting a charter rate schedule or any amendment thereof. Notice of the hearing shall be mailed to each charter-party carrier operating within the district at least 30 days prior to the hearing. The notice shall include the proposed charter rate schedule. At the close of the public hearing the board may adopt charter rate schedules
 that shall not be less than the average for the three largest private charter-party carriers operating similar service within the boundaries of the VTA.

(c) Charter service shall originate and terminate within the area served by the VTA unless a private charter-party carrier requests the VTA to provide service beyond the area served by the VTA.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 381, Sec. 55.   (AB 2196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

100160.6.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 100160.5 or any other law, a district may provide charter bus service for the 2026 FIFA World Cup during the period from June 1, 2026, to July 31, 2026, inclusive, if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) Bus equipment that is designed solely for charter service is not purchased. A bus equipped with a toilet or underfloor baggage compartment shall be deemed charter equipment.

(2) Charter service originates and terminates within the area served by the district unless a private charter-party carrier requests the district to provide service beyond the area served by the district.

(3) The district establishes a schedule of rates for charter bus services that are incidental to the holding of the 2026 FIFA World Cup in the area authorized to be served pursuant to paragraph (2) subject to the following requirements:

(A) The rates for charter-party bus services established under this subdivision are sufficient to pay all marginal costs related to those charter bus services and contribute financially to the reduction of deficits incurred by the district in the operation of scheduled route services.

(B) The rates are at least equal to the average of the lowest rates charged by the three largest private charter-party carriers operating similar service in the greater San Francisco Bay area.

(C) The schedule of rates are effective from June 1, 2026, to July 31, 2026, inclusive.

(4) The district provides charter bus service for the events to the extent that private charter-party carriers are not capable of providing that service.

(b) This section does not override any collective bargaining agreement between the district and a labor organization that represents employees of the district and does not authorize the district to provide charter bus service via contracting with private entities. Any charter bus service provided pursuant to this section shall be operated by the district with employees of the district.

(c) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “District” means the VTA and any other public transportation operator providing public transit services in any portion of the greater San Francisco Bay
 area.

(2) “Greater San Francisco Bay area” means the region comprised of the City and County of San Francisco and the Counties of Alameda, Contra Costa, Marin, Monterey, Napa, San Benito, San Mateo, Santa Clara, Santa Cruz, Solano, and Sonoma.

(3) “Not capable of providing that service” includes, but is not limited to, the inability to meet requirements, including, but not limited to, requirements with regard to unique equipment, fuel type, number of doors, frequency, public safety, accommodations for standing passengers, handicap accessibility, or the nature of the service.

(d) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 109, Sec. 6.   (SB 153)   Effective September 17, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

100161.

(a) The VTA may acquire, construct, own, operate, control, or use rights-of-way, rail lines, buslines, stations, platforms, switches, yards, terminals, and any and all facilities necessary or convenient for transit service within or partly without the boundaries of the VTA, underground, upon, or above the ground and under, upon, or over public streets or other public ways or waterways, together with all physical structures, including parking lots and day care centers and related child care facilities, that are necessary or convenient for the access of persons or vehicles thereto. The VTA may acquire any interest in or rights to use or the joint use of any or all of those facilities.

(b) The VTA may acquire, construct, and
 provide for repair and maintenance of any and all facilities necessary or convenient for vehicular and pedestrian transportation, within or partly without the boundaries of the VTA, underground, upon, or above the ground, together with all physical structures, including parking lots and soundwalls, that are necessary or convenient therefor. In this connection, the VTA may exercise any power with respect to highways granted to counties under Article 1 (commencing with Section 760) of Chapter 4 of Division 1 of the Streets and Highways Code in connection with any project included in the countywide transportation plan and an adopted regional transportation plan, but shall not usurp or impinge upon the powers and responsibilities granted to the county with regard to county highways. Highway and other transportation expenditures shall be consistent with adopted regional transportation plans and programs.

(c) VTA installations in freeways shall be
 subject to the approval of the Department of Transportation. Installations in other state highways shall be subject to Article 2 (commencing with Section 670) of Chapter 3 of Division 1 of the Streets and Highways Code. Installations in county highways and city streets shall be subject to similar encroachment permits.

(d) The VTA shall not use any state transportation funds, including, but not limited to, moneys in the State Highway Account, or the Transportation Planning and Development Account, in the State Transportation Fund, and passenger rail and clean air bond act money to acquire, construct, or operate day care centers and related child care facilities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 381, Sec. 56.   (AB 2196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

100162.

The VTA may lease or contract for the use of its transit facilities, or any portion thereof, to any operator, and may provide for subleases by an operator upon terms and conditions as it deems in the public interest. The word “operator” as used in this section means any public agency or any person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 381, Sec. 57.   (AB 2196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

100163.

The board may contract with any public agency or person to provide transit or transportation facilities and services for the VTA.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 381, Sec. 58.   (AB 2196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

100164.

(a) The VTA may construct and operate or acquire and operate transit works and facilities and may construct, acquire, and provide for repair and maintenance of transportation facilities, in, under, upon, over, across, or along any state or public highway or any stream, bay, or watercourse, or over any of the lands that are the property of the state, to the same extent that the rights and privileges appertaining thereto are granted to municipalities within the state.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), and subject to the approval of the Department of Transportation, the VTA may provide funding for the repair and maintenance of state highways within the boundaries of the VTA.

(2) The VTA shall not directly, or indirectly, except by providing funding pursuant to paragraph (1), repair or maintain any state highway.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 381, Sec. 59.   (AB 2196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

100165.

The VTA may enter into agreements for the joint use of any property and rights by the VTA and any public agency or public utility operating transit facilities; may enter into agreements with any public agency or public utility operating any transit facilities, and wholly or partially within or without the boundaries of the VTA, for the joint use of any property of the VTA or of the public agency or public utility, or the establishment of through routes, joint fares, transfer of passengers, or pooling arrangements.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 381, Sec. 60.   (AB 2196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

100166.

The rates and charges, if any, for transit service furnished pursuant to this part shall be fixed by the board and shall be reasonable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 180.)
-------------------------------------------

100167.

The VTA shall be subject to the provisions of Division 14.8 (commencing with Section 34500) of the Vehicle Code with respect to operation of buses and to the rules and regulations enforceable by the State of California Highway Patrol pursuant to that chapter regulating the safe operation of buses.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 381, Sec. 61.   (AB 2196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

100168.

The VTA shall be subject to the regulations of the Public Utilities Commission relating to safety appliances and procedures, and the commission shall inspect all work done pursuant to this part and may make further additions or changes necessary for the purpose of safety to employees and the general public. The commission shall enforce the provisions of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 381, Sec. 62.   (AB 2196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

100169.

The VTA and any one or more school districts located within its boundaries may enter into agreements pursuant to which school transportation equipment may be used for transit purposes within the VTA’s boundaries during any time that the equipment is not actually required for school purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 381, Sec. 63.   (AB 2196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Public Grants, Loans and Contributions [100170. - 100171.]

100170.

The VTA may accept, without limitation by any other provisions of this part requiring approval of indebtedness, contributions, grants, or loans from any public agency or the United States or any department, instrumentality, or agency thereof, for the purpose of financing the acquisition, construction, maintenance, or operation of transit facilities, or the acquisition and construction of transportation facilities. The VTA may enter into contracts and cooperate with, and accept cooperation from, any public agency or the United States, or agency thereof, in the acquisition, construction, maintenance, or operation, and in financing the acquisition, construction, maintenance, or operation of any transit facilities or in the acquisition and construction of any
 transportation facilities in accordance with any legislation that Congress or the Legislature of the State of California may have heretofore adopted or may hereafter adopt, under which aid, assistance, and cooperation may be furnished by the United States or any public agency in the acquisition, construction, maintenance, and operation of any transit or transportation facilities. The VTA may do any and all things necessary in order to avail itself of aid, assistance, and cooperation under any federal or state legislation now or hereafter enacted. Any evidence of indebtedness issued under this section shall constitute a negotiable instrument.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 381, Sec. 64.   (AB 2196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

100171.

The VTA may obtain temporary transfers of funds in accordance with the last paragraph of Section 6 of Article XVI of the California Constitution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 381, Sec. 65.   (AB 2196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Retail Transaction and Use Tax [100250. - 100256.]

100250.

A retail transactions and use tax ordinance may be adopted by the board of directors in accordance with the provisions of Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, if the electors voting on the measure vote in accordance with Article XIII C of the California Constitution to authorize its enactment at a special election called for that purpose by the board of directors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 381, Sec. 66.   (AB 2196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

100251.

Any transactions and use tax ordinance adopted shall be operative in accordance with Section 7265 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 430, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

100252.

The VTA may contract with the State Board of Equalization for its service in the preparations necessary to administer a transaction and use tax ordinance. The costs to be covered by the contract are to be for services of the types described in Section 7272 of the Revenue and Taxation Code for preparatory work up to the date of the adoption of the ordinance. Any disputes as to the amount of the costs shall be resolved in the same manner as provided in that section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 381, Sec. 67.   (AB 2196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

100253.

Prior to the operative date of the transaction and use tax ordinance, the VTA shall contract with the State Board of Equalization to perform all functions incident to the administration and operation of the ordinance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 381, Sec. 68.   (AB 2196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

100254.

If the VTA shall not have contracted with the State Board of Equalization prior to the operative date of its transaction and use tax ordinance, it shall nevertheless so contract, and, in that case, the operative date shall be the first day of the first calendar quarter following the execution of the contract.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 381, Sec. 69.   (AB 2196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

100255.

Repeal of the transactions and use tax ordinance shall not be operative earlier than the first day of the first calendar quarter following the adoption of the ordinance of repeal.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1204.)
-------------------------------------------

100256.

Whenever a bond election is held to authorize a bonded indebtedness pursuant to Section 100400, the ordinance calling the election may include a statement that the transaction and use taxes, or a stated portion thereof, shall be levied, or continued to be levied, and used to the extent required to pay the principal of, and interest on, the bonds as they become due, to provide any sinking fund payments required therefor, and to create or maintain any reserve fund required therefor.

A vote in favor of the issuance of the bonds shall authorize the use of such taxes for such purposes. The transactions and use tax ordinance shall not
 be repealed until all bonds payable from the revenues derived from such taxes have been fully paid or provision has been made for their payment in full.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1204.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Personnel [100300. - 100381.]



  ARTICLE 1. Employee Relations [100300. - 100312.]

100300.

Employees shall have the right to self-organization, to form, join or assist labor organizations, to bargain collectively through representatives of their own choosing, and to engage in other concerted activities for the purpose of collective bargaining or other mutual aid or protection.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 180.)
-------------------------------------------

100301.

Any question which may arise with respect to whether a majority of employees in an appropriate unit desire to be represented by a labor organization shall be submitted to the Public Employment Relations Board. In resolving those questions of representation including the determination of the appropriate unit or units, petitions, the conduct of hearings and elections, the board shall apply the relevant federal law and
 administrative practice developed under the Labor Management Relations Act of 1947, as amended, and for this purpose shall adopt appropriate rules and regulations. The California State Mediation and Conciliation Service shall administer the rules and regulations and shall provide for a prompt public hearing and secret ballot election to determine the question of representation and shall certify the results to the parties. Any certification of a labor organization to represent or act for the employees in any collective bargaining unit shall not be subject to challenge on the grounds that a new substantial question of representation within the collective bargaining unit exists until the lapse of one year from the date of certification or the expiration of any collective bargaining agreement, whichever is later, except that no collective bargaining agreement shall be considered to be a bar to representation proceedings for a period of more than two years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 46, Sec. 131.   (SB 1038)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

100302.

Whenever a majority of the employees employed by the VTA in a unit appropriate for collective bargaining indicate a desire to be represented by a labor organization and upon determining, as provided in Section 100301, that said labor organization represents at least a majority of the employees in the appropriate unit, the board and the accredited representative of employees shall bargain in good faith and make all reasonable efforts to reach agreement on the terms of a written contract governing wages, hours, and working conditions.
